District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.29

Transfer; assignment; assumption of other powers; duties.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 30, 45 DCR 3747
June 18, 1999, D.C. Law 12-288, § 3(d), 45 DCR 4471
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-188, § 2(b), 49 DCR 6516
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
Section 2(b)(3)(B) of D.C. Law 14-188 provided that the repeal of subsec. (d) shall apply as of September 11, 1998.
Section 33(b)(2) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided that § 30(b)(1) subsec. (b)(1) of this section shall take effect on the latter of: (A) September 11, 1998; or (B) the Dates determined by the Board, but not later than one year after the initial meeting of the Board.
Section 33(b)(1) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided that § 30(a)(1) subsec. (a)(1) of this section shall take effect on the latter of: (A) September 11, 1998; or (B) the Dates determined by the Board, but not later than one year after the initial meeting of the Board.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of National Capital Revitalization Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-140, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9934).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of National Capital Revitalization Corporation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-114, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7649).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-53, Dec. 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).
1981 Ed., § 1-2295.29.